Connecticut, session 2026, HB05411.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of ____ is appropriated to
the Department of Veterans Affairs from the General Fund, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for the purpose of increasing, improving and
otherwise expanding the training conducted by the Office of Advocacy
and Assistance for members of municipal veterans advisory
committees, directors of municipal veterans services and municipal
veterans representatives pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of
section 27-102l of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
LCO No. 2240 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5411